Illinois, session 104th, HB5096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Sections 55-1195 and 11-13-30 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1195 new)7    Sec. 5-1195. Hotels operating as refugee shelters.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "Hotel" has the meaning given to that term in Section 5-5 10of the Hotel and Casino Employee Safety Act.11    "Refugee shelter" means a place that provides essential 12services for refugees forced to flee their homes due to 13conflict, persecution, or disaster. 14    (b) The corporate authorities of a county may not allow a 15hotel within the county that is not within the boundaries of a 16municipality to operate as a refugee shelter unless the hotel 17has received permission to operate as a refugee shelter from 18the corporate authorities of the county.19    (c) The corporate authorities of a county may only provide 20a hotel with permission to operate as a refugee shelter for a 21period of not more than 2 years. The corporate authorities of a 22county may renew a hotel's permission to operate as a refugee 23shelter.  HB5096- 2 -LRB104 17611 RTM 31041 b1    (d) The corporate authorities of a county shall require a 2hotel operating as a refugee shelter to comply with the zoning 3laws of the county.4    (e) This Section does not apply if the Governor declares a 5disaster under Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 6Agency Act.  7    (55 ILCS 5/11-13-30 new)8    Sec. 11-13-30. Hotels operating as refugee shelters.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Hotel" has the meaning given to that term in Section 5-5 11of the Hotel and Casino Employee Safety Act.12    "Refugee shelter" means a place that provides essential 13services for refugees forced to flee their homes due to 14conflict, persecution, or disaster. 15    (b) The corporate authorities of a municipality may not 16allow a hotel within the municipality to operate as a refugee 17shelter unless the hotel has received permission to operate as 18a refugee shelter from the corporate authorities of the 19municipality.20    (c) The corporate authorities of a municipality may only 21provide a hotel with permission to operate as a refugee 22shelter for a period of not more than 2 years. The corporate 23authorities of a municipality may renew a hotel's permission 24to operate as a refugee shelter.25    (d) The corporate authorities of a municipality shall   HB5096- 3 -LRB104 17611 RTM 31041 b1require a hotel operating as a refugee shelter to comply with 2the zoning laws of the municipality.3    (e) This Section does not apply if the Governor declares a 4disaster under Section 7 of the Illinois Emergency Management 5Agency Act.